Illinois, session 104th, HB292.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Prescribed Burning Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (525 ILCS 37/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Prescribed Burning Act.9(Source: P.A. 95-108, eff. 8-13-07.)